New Jersey, session 222, A5139.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 37 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37) is amended to read as follows: 37.  a.  Moneys appropriated from the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund to the State Agriculture Development Committee for farmland preservation purposes shall be used by the committee to: (1)  Provide grants to local government units to pay up to 80 percent of the cost of acquisition of development easements on farmland, and to qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to pay up to [50] 80 percent of the cost of acquisition of development easements on farmland as provided in section 39 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-39), or to provide grants to local government units or qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to pay up to 80 percent of the cost of acquisition of development easements on woodlands, as provided in section 1 of P.L.2025, c.287, provided that any funds received for the transfer of a development easement shall be dedicated to the future purchase of development easements on farmland and the State's pro rata share of any such funds shall be deposited in the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund to be used for the purposes of that fund and provided that the terms of any such development easement to be acquired by a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization shall be approved by the committee; (2)  Provide grants to local government units to pay up to 80 percent of the cost of acquisition of fee simple titles to farmland from willing sellers only, and to qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organizations to pay up to [50] 80 percent of the cost of acquisition of fee simple titles to farmland from willing sellers only as provided in section 39 of this act, which shall be offered for resale or lease with agricultural deed restrictions, as determined by the committee, and any proceeds received from a resale shall be dedicated for farmland preservation purposes and the State's pro rata share of any such proceeds shall be deposited in the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund to be used for the purposes of that fund; (3)  Pay the cost of acquisition by the State of development easements on farmland, or on woodlands, as provided in section 1 of P.L.2025, c.287, provided that any funds received for the transfer of a development easement shall be deposited in the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund to be used for the purposes of that fund; and (4)  Pay the cost of acquisition by the State of fee simple titles to farmland from willing sellers only, which shall be offered for resale or lease with agricultural deed restrictions, as determined by the committee, and any proceeds received from a resale or lease shall be deposited in the Garden State Farmland Preservation Trust Fund to be used for the purposes of that fund. b.    Moneys appropriated from the fund may be used to match grants, contributions, donations, or reimbursements from federal aid programs or from other public or private sources established for the same or similar purposes as the fund. (cf:  P.L.2025, c.287, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.